Wisconsin, session 2025, AB163.
do enact as follows:AB163,11Section 1. 49.45 (2) (a) 3m. of the statutes is created to read:AB163,2,4249.45 (2) (a) 3m. Remove immediately from eligibility for the Medical 3Assistance program under sub. (23) or s. 49.471 any individual who has been 4determined to be ineligible.AB163,25Section 2. 49.471 (4d), (4j) and (4p) of the statutes are created to read:AB163,3,6649.471 (4d) Redetermination of eligibility. The department may not 7automatically renew the eligibility of a recipient of Medical Assistance benefits 8under this section or s. 49.45 (23). The department shall redetermine eligibility for 1the Medical Assistance program under this section or s. 49.45 (23) for each 2individual every 6 months. In collecting information from a recipient of Medical 3Assistance benefits or an applicant, the department may not use any form that is 4prepopulated with, or otherwise provide to the recipient or applicant, information 5that has been supplied to the department except for the recipient’s or applicant’s 6name and address.AB163,3,127(4j) Failure to report. Any recipient of Medical Assistance benefits under 8this section or s. 49.45 (23) who fails to report to the department or an entity 9designated by the department any change that may affect the recipient’s eligibility 10for benefits within 10 days following such a change shall be ineligible for benefits 11under this section or s. 49.45 (23) for 6 months following the date that the 12department discovers the failure to report the change.AB163,3,1913(4p) Federal approval. If the department determines that it is necessary to 14obtain permission from the federal department of health and human services to 15implement sub. (4d) or (4j), the department shall request any state plan 16amendment, waiver of federal law, or other federal approval necessary to implement 17subs. (4d) and (4j). If federal approval is necessary under this subsection but not 18obtained, the department is not required to implement any portion of sub. (4d) or 19(4j) for which federal approval is not obtained.AB163,320Section 3. 49.823 of the statutes is renumbered 49.823 (1) and amended to 21read:AB163,4,82249.823 (1) The department of health services and the department of children 23and families shall, at least once every 3 months month, perform a comparison of 24each department’s respective public benefit database information against 1nationally recognized databases that contain information on death records, 2including the federal social security administration’s Death Master File, to identify 3participants in public benefit programs that are deceased. If a department 4determines during a review under this section subsection that a participant is 5deceased, the department shall designate that individual as ineligible for benefits 6in any applicable database. The requirements under this section subsection do not 7apply to the department of children and families with regard to child care subsidies 8under s. 49.155.AB163,49Section 4. 49.823 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB163,4,211049.823 (2) The department of health services shall enter into a data-sharing 11agreement with the department of children and families, the department of 12workforce development, and any other agency that maintains a database of 13financial or personal information about residents of this state. The department of 14health services, through the data-sharing agreement, shall confirm the information 15submitted by an applicant for a public assistance program with the information 16contained in other databases held by other agencies, including all available prison 17records, death records, wage and employment records, lottery and gaming 18winnings, and out-of-state benefits received under the federal food stamp program 19under 7 USC 2011 to 2036. The department of health services shall share data 20with other agencies for the purposes of confirming eligibility for public assistance 21programs.AB163,522Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.AB163,4,2323(1) Medical Assistance eligibility redeterminations.AB163,5,21(a) In this subsection, “Medical Assistance” means the program under subch. 2IV of ch. 49.AB163,5,83(b) Beginning on the day after the effective date of this paragraph, the 4department of health services shall redetermine the eligibility of all recipients of 5Medical Assistance and immediately remove from Medical Assistance any recipient 6who is ineligible. The department of health services shall complete 7redeterminations of eligibility for all recipients of Medical Assistance before 8January 1, 2026.AB163,5,139(c) The department of health services shall inform any individual who is 10removed from Medical Assistance under par. (b) of the availability of coverage 11under a qualified health plan, as defined in 42 USC 18021 (a), that is offered 12through an American health benefit exchange, as described in 42 USC 18031, and 13that the individual may be eligible for premium assistance under 26 USC 36B.AB163,5,1414